Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.220

Pleading exemptions or exceptions—Burden of proof.

It shall not be necessary to negate any of the exemptions, or exceptions from a definition, of this chapter in any complaint, information, or indictment, or any writ or proceeding brought under this chapter; and the burden of proof of any such exemption or exception from a definition shall be on the party claiming the same.

[ 1986 c 14 s 23.]